Massachusetts, session 194th, H588.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 2DDDDDD the following section:-
Section 2EEEEEE. There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Gateway City Public School Driver Education
Trust Fund, administered by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. There
shall be credited to the fund all fees collected and designated to the fund under paragraph (21) of
section 33 of chapter 90, any appropriations, grants, gifts or other monies authorized by the
general court or other parties and specifically designated to be credited to the fund and any
income derived from the investment of amounts credited to the fund. All amounts credited to the
fund may be expended, subject to appropriation, provided that all unexpended balances
of 2

remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and may
be appropriated for expenditure in the subsequent fiscal year. Expenditures from the fund shall
be used for the implementation of section 13D 1/2 of chapter 71.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (21) of section 33 of chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby
amended by adding the following sentence:-
A sum equal to 1 per cent of the fees collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be
transferred to the gateway city public school driver education trust fund, established under
section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29.
SECTION 3. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 13D the following section:-
Section 13D 1/2. There shall be a gateway city public school driver education program
for providing affordable access to motor vehicle driver education to students from low-income
communities in the commonwealth. The program shall be administered by the department.
A public high school located in a gateway municipality, as defined by section 3A of
chapter 23A, may offer a motor vehicle driver education course, in accordance with section 13D,
during the regular school day or evening as an elective course. Participants of the course shall be
residents of a gateway municipality.
Expenditures from the gateway city public school driver education trust fund, established
under section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29, shall be made to reduce tuition fees or provide tuition at
no cost to participants in the program.
of 2